Oklahoma, session 2026, SB809.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 353.1a, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 353.1a. A. Prescribing authority shall be allowed,


under the medical direction of a supervising physician, for an


advanced practice nurse recognized by the Oklahoma Board of Nursing


in one of the following categories: advanced registered nurse


practitioners, clinical nurse specialists, or certified nurse-


midwives. The advanced practice nurse may write or sign, or


transmit by word of mouth, telephone or other means of communication


an order for drugs or medical supplies that is intended to be


filled, compounded, or dispensed by a pharmacist. The supervising


physician and the advanced practice nurse shall be identified at the


time of origination of the prescription and the name of the advanced


practice nurse shall be printed on the prescription label.


B. Pharmacists may dispense prescriptions for non-controlled


prescription drugs authorized by an advanced practice nurse or


physician assistant, not located in Oklahoma, provided that they are


licensed in the state in which they are actively prescribing.



Req. No. 889 Page 2


C. Pharmacists may only dispense prescriptions for controlled


dangerous substances prescribed by an:


advanced practice nurse or 1. A physician assistant licensed in


this state; or


2. An advance practice nurse licensed in the State of Oklahoma


this state and supervised by an Oklahoma-licensed practitioner.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 519.2, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 519.2. As used in the Physician Assistant Act:


1. “Board” means the State Board of Medical Licensure and


Supervision;


2. “Committee” means the Physician Assistant Committee;


3. “Practice of medicine” means services which require training


in the diagnosis, treatment and prevention of disease, including the


use and administration of drugs, and which are performed by


physician assistants so long as such services are within the


physician assistants’ skill,. For a physician assistant required to


practice under supervision of a delegating physician, services form


a component of the physician’s scope of practice, and are provided


with physician supervision, including authenticating by signature


any form that may be authenticated by the delegating physician’s


signature with prior delegation by the physician;


4. “Patient care setting” means and includes, but is not


limited to, a physician’s office, clinic, hospital, nursing home,

Req. No. 889 Page 3


extended care facility, patient’s home, ambulatory surgical center,


hospice facility or any other setting authorized by the delegating


physician;


5. “Physician assistant” means a health care professional,


qualified by academic and clinical education and licensed by the


State Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision, to practice


medicine with physician supervision as a physician assistant;


6. 5. “Delegating physician” means an individual holding a


license in good standing as a physician from the State Board of


Medical Licensure and Supervision or the State Board of Osteopathic


Examiners, who supervises one or more physician assistants and


delegates decision making pursuant to the practice agreement;


7. 6. “Supervision” means overseeing or delegating the


activities of the medical services rendered by a physician assistant


through a practice agreement between a medical doctor or osteopathic


delegating physician performing procedures or directly or indirectly


involved with the treatment of a patient, and the physician


assistant working jointly toward a common goal of providing


services. Delegation shall be defined by the practice agreement.


The physical presence of the delegating physician is not required as


long as the delegating physician and physician assistant are or can


be easily in contact with each other by telecommunication. At all


times a physician assistant required to practice under supervision


shall be considered an agent of the delegating physician;

Req. No. 889 Page 4


8. 7. “Telecommunication” means the use of electronic


technologies to transmit words, sounds or images for interpersonal


communication, clinical care (telemedicine) and review of electronic


health records; and


9. 8. “Practice agreement” means a written agreement between a


physician assistant and the a delegating physician concerning the


scope of practice of the physician assistant to only be determined


by the delegating physician and the physician assistant based on the


education, training, skills and experience of the physician


assistant. The agreement shall involve the joint formulation,


discussion and agreement on the methods of supervision and


collaboration for diagnosis, consultation and treatment of medical


conditions and shall include the scope of and any limitations on


prescribing. A practice agreement shall be required for a physician


assistant described in subsection C of Section 519.6 of this title.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 519.3, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 519.3. A. There is hereby created the Physician


Assistant Committee, which shall be composed of seven (7) nine (9)


members. Three Five members of the Committee shall be physician


assistants appointed by the State Board of Medical Licensure and


Supervision from a list of qualified individuals submitted by the


Oklahoma Academy of Physician Assistants. One member shall be a


physician appointed by the Board from its membership. One member

Req. No. 889 Page 5


shall be a physician appointed by the Board from a list of qualified


individuals submitted by the Oklahoma State Medical Association and


who is not a member of the Board. One member shall be a physician


appointed by the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners from its


membership. One member shall be a physician appointed by the State


Board of Osteopathic Examiners from a list of qualified individuals


submitted by the Oklahoma Osteopathic Association and who is not a


member of said board the Board.


B. The term of office for each member of the Committee shall be


five (5) years.


C. The Committee shall meet at least quarterly. At the initial


meeting of each calendar year, the Committee members shall elect a


chair from the physician assistant members. The chair or his or her


designee shall represent the Committee at all meetings of the Board.


Four Five members shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of


conducting official business of the Committee.


D. The State Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision is


hereby granted the power and authority to promulgate rules, which


are in accordance with the provisions of Section 519.1 et seq. of


this title, governing the requirements for licensure as a physician


assistant, as well as to establish standards for training, approve


institutions for training, and regulate the standards of practice of


a physician assistant after licensure, including the power of


revocation of a license.

Req. No. 889 Page 6


E. The State Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision is


hereby granted the power and authority to investigate all


complaints, hold hearings, subpoena witnesses and initiate


prosecution concerning violations of Section 519.1 et seq. of this


title. When such complaints involve physicians licensed by the


State Board of Osteopathic Examiners, the State Board of Osteopathic


Examiners shall be officially notified of such complaints.


F. 1. The Committee shall advise the Board on all matters


pertaining to the practice of physician assistants.


2. The Committee shall review and make recommendations to the


Board on all applications for licensure as a physician assistant and


all applications to practice which shall be approved by the Board.


When considering applicants for licensure, to establish standards of


training or approve institutions for training, the Committee shall


include the Director, or designee, of all Physician Assistant


educational programs conducted by institutions of higher education


in the state as members.


3. The Committee shall assist and advise the Board in all


hearings involving physician assistants who are deemed to be in


violation of Section 519.1 et seq. of this title or the rules of the


Board.


SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 519.6, is


amended to read as follows:



Req. No. 889 Page 7


Section 519.6. A. No health care services may be performed by


a physician assistant unless a current license is on file with and


approved by the State Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision.


B. 1. A physician assistant who has completed not less than


six thousand two hundred forty (6,240) hours of postgraduate


clinical practice experience, including any such hours completed


prior to the effective date of this act, and who has reported such


hours to the Board shall not be required to practice under the


supervision of a delegating physician. A physician assistant may


report the completion of such hours to the Board at any time.


2. The Board shall maintain, make available, and keep updated,


on the website of the Board, a list of physician assistants who have


reported completion of the postgraduate clinical practice hours


stipulated by this subsection.


3. The Board shall, within ninety (90) days of enactment,


prescribe a form for reporting postgraduate clinical practice


experience by a physician assistant. The Board shall make available


and keep updated on the website of the Board the prescribed form.


The prescribed form may be filed electronically. The Board shall


not charge a fee for reporting hours or filing the prescribed form.


4. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit a physician


assistant who has completed the postgraduate clinical practice hours


stipulated by this subsection from voluntarily maintaining a



Req. No. 889 Page 8


practice agreement. Provided, any practice agreements shall be


subject to the requirements of subsection C of this section.


5. Nothing in this subsection shall restrict the power of the


Board to require supervision as a disciplinary action against the


license of a physician assistant.


C. A physician assistant who has not completed the postgraduate


clinical practice hours stipulated by subsection B of this section,


or who has completed such hours but has not reported such hours to


the Board, shall practice under the supervision of a delegating


physician with the following requirements:


1. All practice agreements and any amendments shall be filed


with the State Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision within ten


(10) business days of being executed. Practice agreements may be


filed electronically. The State Board of Medical Licensure and


Supervision shall not charge a fee for filing practice agreements or


amendments of practice agreements.;


B. 2. A physician assistant may have practice agreements with


multiple allopathic or osteopathic physicians. Each physician shall


be in good standing with the State Board of Medical Licensure and


Supervision or the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners.;


C. 3. The delegating physician need not be physically present


nor be specifically consulted before each delegated patient care


service is performed by a physician assistant, so long as the


delegating physician and physician assistant are or can be easily in

Req. No. 889 Page 9


contact with one another by means of telecommunication. In all


patient care settings, the The delegating physician shall provide


appropriate methods of participating in health care services


provided by the physician assistant including:


a. being responsible for the formulation or approval of


all orders and protocols, whether standing orders,


direct orders or any other orders or protocols, which


direct the delivery of health care services provided


by a physician assistant, and periodically reviewing


such orders and protocols,


b. regularly reviewing the health care services provided


by the physician assistant and any problems or


complications encountered,


c. being available physically or through telemedicine or


direct telecommunications for consultation, assistance


with medical emergencies or patient referral,


d. reviewing a sample of outpatient medical records.


Such reviews shall take place at a site agreed upon


between the delegating physician and physician


assistant in the practice agreement which may also


occur using electronic or virtual conferencing, and


e. that it remains clear that the physician assistant is


an agent of the delegating physician; but, in no event



Req. No. 889 Page 10


shall the delegating physician be an employee of the


physician assistant.; and


D. 4. In patients with newly diagnosed complex illnesses, the


physician assistant shall contact the delegating physician within


forty-eight (48) hours of the physician assistant’s initial


examination or treatment and schedule the patient for appropriate


evaluation by the delegating physician as directed by the physician.


The delegating physician shall determine which conditions qualify as


complex illnesses based on the clinical setting and the skill and


experience of the physician assistant.


E. D. 1. A physician assistant under the direction of a


delegating physician not practicing under a practice agreement may


prescribe written and oral prescriptions and orders. The physician


assistant not practicing under a practice agreement may prescribe


medical supplies, services, and drugs, including controlled


medications in Schedules II III through V pursuant to Section 2-312


of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and medical supplies and


services as delegated by the delegating physician and as approved by


the State Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision after


consultation with the State Board of Pharmacy on the Physician


Assistant Drug Formulary. Physician assistants not practicing under


a practice agreement may not dispense drugs, but may request,


receive, and sign for professional samples and may distribute


professional samples to patients.

Req. No. 889 Page 11


2. A physician assistant may write an order for a Schedule II


drug for immediate or ongoing administration on site. Prescriptions


and orders for Schedule II drugs written by a physician assistant


must be included on a written protocol determined by the delegating


physician and approved by the medical staff committee of the


facility or by direct verbal order of the delegating physician.


Physician assistants may not dispense drugs, but may request,


receive, and sign for professional samples and may distribute


professional samples to patients.


F. A physician assistant may perform health care services in


patient care settings as authorized by the delegating physician


practicing under a practice agreement may prescribe written and oral


prescriptions and orders. The physician assistant practicing under


a practice agreement may, only as delegated by the delegating


physician, prescribe medical supplies, services, and drugs,


including controlled medications in Schedules II through V pursuant


to Section 2-312 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


Prescriptions and orders for Schedule II drugs written by such


physician assistant shall be included on a written protocol


determined by the delegating physician. Physician assistants


practicing under a practice agreement shall not dispense drugs, but


may request, receive, and sign for professional samples and may


distribute professional samples to patients. A physician assistant


practicing under a practice agreement shall not prescribe any

Req. No. 889 Page 12


controlled medications in a schedule in which the delegating


physician is not registered to prescribe.


G. E. Each physician assistant licensed under the Physician


Assistant Act shall keep his or her license available for inspection


at the primary place of business and shall, when engaged in


professional activities, identify himself or herself as a physician


assistant.


H. F. A physician assistant shall be bound by the provisions


contained in Sections 725.1 through 725.5 of Title 59 of the


Oklahoma Statutes this title.


SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 519.11, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 164, O.S.L. 2022 (59 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 519.11), is amended to read as follows:


Section 519.11. A. Nothing in the Physician Assistant Act


shall be construed to prevent or restrict the practice, services or


activities of any persons of other licensed professions or personnel


supervised by licensed professions in this state from performing


work incidental to the practice of their profession or occupation,


if that person does not represent himself or herself as a physician


assistant.


B. Nothing stated in the Physician Assistant Act shall prevent


any hospital from requiring the physician assistant or the


delegating physician to meet and maintain certain staff appointment



Req. No. 889 Page 13


and credentialing qualifications for the privilege of practicing as,


or utilizing, a physician assistant in the hospital.


C. Nothing in the Physician Assistant Act shall be construed to


permit a physician assistant to practice medicine or prescribe drugs


and medical supplies in this state except when such actions are


performed under the supervision and at the direction of a physician


or physicians approved by the State Board of Medical Licensure and


Supervision.


D. Nothing herein in this section shall be construed to require


licensure under the Physician Assistant Act of a physician assistant


student enrolled in a physician assistant educational program


accredited by the Accreditation Review Commission on Education for


the Physician Assistant.


E. D. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no one person


who is not a physician licensed to practice medicine in this state


may perform acts restricted to such physicians pursuant to the


provisions of Section 1-731 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


This paragraph is inseverable.


F. E. Nothing in the Physician Assistant Act shall limit the


activities of a physician assistant in the performance of their


duties if the physician assistant is employed by or under contract


with the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or if the


physician assistant is employed by, under contract with, or


commissioned by one of the uniformed services; provided, the

Req. No. 889 Page 14


physician assistant must be currently licensed in this state or any


other state or currently credentialed as a physician assistant by


the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or the applicable


uniformed service. Any physician assistant who is employed by or


under contract with the United States Department of Veterans Affairs


or is employed by, under contract with, or commissioned by one of


the uniformed services and practices outside of such employment,


contract, or commission shall be subject to the Physician Assistant


Act while practicing outside of such employment, contract, or


commission. As used in this subsection, “uniformed services” shall


have the same meaning as provided by Title 10 of the U.S. Code.


SECTION 6. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 521.2, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 521.2. A. Payment for services within the physician


assistant’s scope of practice by a health insurance plan shall be


made when ordered or performed by the physician assistant, if the


same service would have been covered if ordered or performed by a


physician. An in-network A physician assistant shall be authorized


to bill for and receive direct payment for the medically necessary


services the physician assistant delivers.


B. To ensure accountability and transparency for patients,


payers and the health care system, an in-network a physician


assistant shall be identified as the rendering professional in the



Req. No. 889 Page 15


billing and claims process when the physician assistant delivers


medical or surgical services to patients.


C. No insurance company or third-party payer shall impose a


practice, education, or collaboration requirement that is


inconsistent with or more restrictive than existing physician


assistant state laws or regulations.


SECTION 7. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 1-317, as


last amended by Section 1, Chapter 251, O.S.L. 2024 (63 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 1-317), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1-317. A. A death certificate for each death which


occurs in this state shall be filed with the State Department of


Health within ten (10) calendar days after such death.


B. It shall be the duty of the funeral director to file the


death certificate. If the funeral director is not available, the


person acting as such who first assumes custody of a dead body in


accordance with Section 1158 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


shall personally sign and file the death certificate. The funeral


director shall obtain the personal data from the next of kin or the


best qualified person or source available, enter the personal data


into the electronic system prescribed by the State Registrar of


Vital Statistics, and electronically transmit the partial


certificate produced by the electronic system to the physician,


physician assistant, Advanced Practice Registered Nurse, or medical


examiner responsible for completing the medical certification

Req. No. 889 Page 16


portion of the certificate of death within twenty-four (24) hours


after the death.


C. 1. The medical certification shall be completed and


certified within five (5) calendar days after receipt of the partial


certificate by the physician, physician assistant, or Advanced


Practice Registered Nurse in charge of the patient’s care for the


illness or condition which resulted in death, except when inquiry as


to the cause of death is required by Section 938 of this title. The


physician, physician assistant, or Advanced Practice Registered


Nurse shall enter and certify the medical certification portion of


certificate data in the electronic system prescribed by the State


Registrar of Vital Statistics.


2. In the event that the physician, physician assistant, or


Advanced Practice Registered Nurse in charge of the patient’s care


for the illness or condition which resulted in death is not in


attendance at the time of death, the medical certification shall be


completed and signed within five (5) calendar days after receipt of


the partial certificate by the physician, physician assistant, or


Advanced Practice Registered Nurse in attendance at the time of


death, except:


a. when the patient is under hospice care at the time of


death, the medical certification may be signed by the


hospice’s medical director, and



Req. No. 889 Page 17


b. when inquiry as to the cause of death is required by


Section 938 of this title.


Provided, that such certification, if signed by other than the


attending physician, physician assistant, or Advanced Practice


Registered Nurse, shall note on the face the name of the attending


physician, physician assistant, or Advanced Practice Registered


Nurse and that the information shown is only as reported.


D. Within four (4) calendar days after receipt of the medical


certification from the physician, physician assistant, or Advanced


Practice Registered Nurse as described in subsection C of this


section, the funeral director shall conduct a final review of the


personal data and the medical certification, electronically sign the


death certificate, and submit the death certificate to the State


Registrar of Vital Statistics through the electronic system


prescribed by the State Registrar of Vital Statistics for official


registration.


E. A certifier completing cause of death on a certificate of


death who knows that a lethal drug, overdose or other means of


assisting suicide within the meaning of Sections 3141.2 through


3141.4 of this title caused or contributed to the death shall list


that means among the chain of events under cause of death or list it


in the box that describes how the injury occurred. If such means is


in the chain of events under cause of death or in the box that



Req. No. 889 Page 18


describes how the injury occurred, the certifier shall indicate


“suicide” as the manner of death.


F. The authority of a A physician assistant who is subject to


supervision by a delegating physician under Section 519.6 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes may only carry out the functions


described in this section shall be governed as permitted by the


practice agreement as provided by under Section 519.6 of Title 59 of


the Oklahoma Statutes.


G. A physician, physician assistant, or Advanced Practice


Registered Nurse completing and signing a medical certification in


accordance with this section shall not be liable in a civil action


to recover damages for any acts or omissions relating to the medical


certification if the cause of death is determined in good faith


using the individual’s best clinical judgment consistent with


current guidance provided by the applicable licensing board, unless


the acts or omissions amount to willful or wanton misconduct. The


immunity provided by this subsection shall be in addition to any


other immunity from liability to which these individuals may be


entitled.


SECTION 8. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-101, as


last amended by Section 1, Chapter 308, O.S.L. 2024 (63 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 2-101), is amended to read as follows:


Section 2-101. As used in the Uniform Controlled Dangerous


Substances Act:

Req. No. 889 Page 19


1. “Acute pain” means pain, whether resulting from disease,


accidental trauma, intentional trauma, or other cause that the


practitioner reasonably expects to last only a short period of time.


Acute pain does not include chronic pain, pain being treated as part


of cancer care, hospice or other end-of-life care, or pain being


treated as part of palliative care;


2. “Administer” means the direct application of a controlled


dangerous substance, whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion or


any other means, to the body of a patient, animal or research


subject by:


a. a practitioner (or, in the presence of the


practitioner, by the authorized agent of the


practitioner), or


b. the patient or research subject at the direction and


in the presence of the practitioner;


3. “Agent” means a peace officer appointed by and who acts on


behalf of the Director of the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and


Dangerous Drugs Control or an authorized person who acts on behalf


of or at the direction of a person who manufactures, distributes,


dispenses, prescribes, administers or uses for scientific purposes


controlled dangerous substances but does not include a common or


contract carrier, public warehouser or employee thereof, or a person


required to register under the Uniform Controlled Dangerous


Substances Act;

Req. No. 889 Page 20


4. “Anhydrous ammonia” means any substance that exhibits


cryogenic evaporative behavior and tests positive for ammonia;


5. “Board” means the Advisory Board to the Director of the


Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control;


6. “Bureau” means the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and


Dangerous Drugs Control;


7. “Chronic pain” means pain that persists beyond the usual


course of an acute disease or healing of an injury. Chronic pain


may or may not be associated with an acute or chronic pathologic


process that causes continuous or intermittent pain over months or


years;


8. “Coca leaves” includes cocaine and any compound,


manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture or preparation of coca


leaves, except derivatives of coca leaves which do not contain


cocaine or ecgonine;


9. “Commissioner” or “Director” means the Director of the


Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control;


10. “Control” means to add, remove or change the placement of a


drug, substance or immediate precursor under the Uniform Controlled


Dangerous Substances Act;


11. “Controlled dangerous substance” means a drug, substance or


immediate precursor in Schedules I through V of the Uniform


Controlled Dangerous Substances Act or any drug, substance or


immediate precursor listed either temporarily or permanently as a

Req. No. 889 Page 21


federally controlled substance. Any conflict between state and


federal law with regard to the particular schedule in which a


substance is listed shall be resolved in favor of state law;


12. “Counterfeit substance” means a controlled substance which,


or the container or labeling of which without authorization, bears


the trademark, trade name or other identifying marks, imprint,


number or device or any likeness thereof of a manufacturer,


distributor or dispenser other than the person who in fact


manufactured, distributed or dispensed the substance;


13. “Deliver” or “delivery” means the actual, constructive or


attempted transfer from one person to another of a controlled


dangerous substance or drug paraphernalia, whether or not there is


an agency relationship;


14. “Dispense” means to deliver a controlled dangerous


substance to an ultimate user or human research subject by or


pursuant to the lawful order of a practitioner, including the


prescribing, administering, packaging, labeling or compounding


necessary to prepare the substance for such distribution.


“Dispenser” is a practitioner who delivers a controlled dangerous


substance to an ultimate user or human research subject;


15. “Distribute” means to deliver other than by administering


or dispensing a controlled dangerous substance;


16. “Distributor” means a commercial entity engaged in the


distribution or reverse distribution of narcotics and dangerous

Req. No. 889 Page 22


drugs and who complies with all regulations promulgated by the


federal Drug Enforcement Administration and the Oklahoma State


Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control;


17. “Drug” means articles:


a. recognized in the official United States Pharmacopeia,


official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United


States, or official National Formulary, or any


supplement to any of them,


b. intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation,


treatment or prevention of disease in man or other


animals,


c. other than food, intended to affect the structure or


any function of the body of man or other animals, and


d. intended for use as a component of any article


specified in this paragraph;


provided, however, the term drug does not include devices or their


components, parts or accessories;


18. “Drug paraphernalia” means all equipment, products, and


materials of any kind which are used, intended for use, or fashioned


specifically for use in planting, propagating, cultivating, growing,


harvesting, manufacturing, compounding, converting, producing,


processing, preparing, testing, analyzing, packaging, repackaging,


storing, containing, concealing, injecting, ingesting, inhaling, or


otherwise introducing into the human body, a controlled dangerous

Req. No. 889 Page 23


substance in violation of the Uniform Controlled Dangerous


Substances Act including, but not limited to:


a. kits used, intended for use, or fashioned specifically


for use in planting, propagating, cultivating,


growing, or harvesting of any species of plant which


is a controlled dangerous substance or from which a


controlled dangerous substance can be derived,


b. kits used, intended for use, or fashioned specifically


for use in manufacturing, compounding, converting,


producing, processing, or preparing controlled


dangerous substances,


c. isomerization devices used, intended for use, or


fashioned specifically for use in increasing the


potency of any species of plant which is a controlled


dangerous substance,


d. testing equipment used, intended for use, or fashioned


specifically for use in identifying or in analyzing


the strength, effectiveness, or purity of controlled


dangerous substances,


e. scales and balances used, intended for use, or


fashioned specifically for use in weighing or


measuring controlled dangerous substances,


f. diluents and adulterants, such as quinine


hydrochloride, mannitol, mannite, dextrose, and

Req. No. 889 Page 24


lactose used, intended for use, or fashioned


specifically for use in cutting controlled dangerous


substances,


g. separation gins and sifters used, intended for use, or


fashioned specifically for use in removing twigs and


seeds from, or in otherwise cleaning or refining,


marijuana,


h. blenders, bowls, containers, spoons, and mixing


devices used, intended for use, or fashioned


specifically for use in compounding controlled


dangerous substances,


i. capsules, balloons, envelopes, and other containers


used, intended for use, or fashioned specifically for


use in packaging small quantities of controlled


dangerous substances,


j. containers and other objects used, intended for use,


or fashioned specifically for use in parenterally


injecting controlled dangerous substances into the


human body,


k. hypodermic syringes, needles, and other objects used,


intended for use, or fashioned specifically for use in


parenterally injecting controlled dangerous substances


into the human body, except as authorized by Section


2-1101 of this title,

Req. No. 889 Page 25


l. objects used, intended for use, or fashioned


specifically for use in ingesting, inhaling, or


otherwise introducing marijuana, cocaine, hashish, or


hashish oil into the human body, such as:


(1) metal, wooden, acrylic, glass, stone, plastic, or


ceramic pipes with or without screens, permanent


screens, hashish heads, or punctured metal bowls,


(2) water pipes,


(3) carburetion tubes and devices,


(4) smoking and carburetion masks,


(5) roach clips, meaning objects used to hold burning


material, such as a marijuana cigarette, that has


become too small or too short to be held in the


hand,


(6) miniature cocaine spoons and cocaine vials,


(7) chamber pipes,


(8) carburetor pipes,


(9) electric pipes,


(10) air-driven pipes,


(11) chillums,


(12) bongs, or


(13) ice pipes or chillers,


m. all hidden or novelty pipes, and



Req. No. 889 Page 26


n. any pipe that has a tobacco bowl or chamber of less


than one-half (1/2) inch in diameter in which there is


any detectable residue of any controlled dangerous


substance as defined in this section or any other


substances not legal for possession or use;


provided, however, the term drug paraphernalia shall not include


separation gins intended for use in preparing tea or spice, clamps


used for constructing electrical equipment, water pipes designed for


ornamentation in which no detectable amount of an illegal substance


is found or pipes designed and used solely for smoking tobacco,


traditional pipes of an American Indian tribal religious ceremony,


antique pipes that are thirty (30) years of age or older, or drug


testing strips possessed by a person for purposes of determining the


presence of fentanyl or a fentanyl-related compound;


19. “Drug-dependent person” means a person who is using a


controlled dangerous substance and who is in a state of psychic or


physical dependence, or both, arising from administration of that


controlled dangerous substance on a continuous basis. Drug


dependence is characterized by behavioral and other responses which


include a strong compulsion to take the substance on a continuous


basis in order to experience its psychic effects, or to avoid the


discomfort of its absence;


20. “Harm-reduction services” means programs established to:



Req. No. 889 Page 27


a. reduce the spread of infectious diseases related to


injection drug use,


b. reduce drug dependency, overdose deaths, and


associated complications, and


c. increase safe recovery and disposal of used syringes


and sharp waste;


21. “Hazardous materials” means materials, whether solid,


liquid, or gas, which are toxic to human, animal, aquatic, or plant


life, and the disposal of such materials is controlled by state or


federal guidelines;


22. “Home care agency” means any sole proprietorship,


partnership, association, corporation, or other organization which


administers, offers, or provides home care services, for a fee or


pursuant to a contract for such services, to clients in their place


of residence;


23. “Home care services” means skilled or personal care


services provided to clients in their place of residence for a fee;


24. “Hospice” means a centrally administered, nonprofit or for-


profit, medically directed, nurse-coordinated program which provides


a continuum of home and inpatient care for the terminally ill


patient and the patient’s family. Such term shall also include a


centrally administered, nonprofit or for-profit, medically directed,


nurse-coordinated program if such program is licensed pursuant to


the provisions of the Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Act.

Req. No. 889 Page 28


A hospice program offers palliative and supportive care to meet the


special needs arising out of the physical, emotional and spiritual


stresses which are experienced during the final stages of illness


and during dying and bereavement. This care is available twenty-


four (24) hours a day, seven (7) days a week, and is provided on the


basis of need, regardless of ability to pay. “Class A” Hospice


refers to Medicare-certified hospices. “Class B” refers to all


other providers of hospice services;


25. “Imitation controlled substance” means a substance that is


not a controlled dangerous substance, which by dosage unit


appearance, color, shape, size, markings or by representations made,


would lead a reasonable person to believe that the substance is a


controlled dangerous substance, or is a drug intended solely for


veterinary purposes that is not a controlled dangerous substance and


is being used outside of the scope of practice or normal course of


business, as defined by the State Board of Veterinary Medical


Examiners, or is a federal Food and Drug Administration-approved


drug that is not a controlled dangerous substance and is being used


outside the scope of approval for illicit purposes such as


adulterating or lacing other controlled dangerous substances. In


the event the appearance of the dosage unit or use is not reasonably


sufficient to establish that the substance is an imitation


controlled substance, the court or authority concerned should


consider, in addition to all other factors, the following factors:

Req. No. 889 Page 29


a. statements made by an owner or by any other person in


control of the substance concerning the nature of the


substance, or its use or effect,


b. statements made to the recipient that the substance


may be resold for inordinate profit,


c. whether the substance is packaged in a manner normally


used for illicit controlled substances,


d. evasive tactics or actions utilized by the owner or


person in control of the substance to avoid detection


by law enforcement authorities,


e. prior convictions, if any, of an owner, or any other


person in control of the object, under state or


federal law related to controlled substances or fraud,


and


f. the proximity of the substances to controlled


dangerous substances;


26. “Immediate precursor” means a substance which the Director


has found to be and by regulation designates as being the principal


compound commonly used or produced primarily for use, and which is


an immediate chemical intermediary used, or likely to be used, in


the manufacture of a controlled dangerous substance, the control of


which is necessary to prevent, curtail or limit such manufacture;


27. “Initial prescription” means a prescription issued to a


patient who:

Req. No. 889 Page 30


a. has never previously been issued a prescription for


the drug or its pharmaceutical equivalent in the past


year, or


b. requires a prescription for the drug or its


pharmaceutical equivalent due to a surgical procedure


or new acute event and has previously had a


prescription for the drug or its pharmaceutical


equivalent within the past year.


When determining whether a patient was previously issued a


prescription for a drug or its pharmaceutical equivalent, the


practitioner shall consult with the patient and review the medical


record and prescription monitoring information of the patient;


28. “Isomer” means the optical isomer, except as used in


subsections C and F of Section 2-204 of this title and paragraph 4


of subsection A of Section 2-206 of this title. As used in


subsections C and F of Section 2-204 of this title, isomer means the


optical, positional, or geometric isomer. As used in paragraph 4 of


subsection A of Section 2-206 of this title, the term isomer means


the optical or geometric isomer;


29. “Laboratory” means a laboratory approved by the Director as


proper to be entrusted with the custody of controlled dangerous


substances and the use of controlled dangerous substances for


scientific and medical purposes and for purposes of instruction;



Req. No. 889 Page 31


30. “Manufacture” means the production, preparation,


propagation, compounding or processing of a controlled dangerous


substance, either directly or indirectly by extraction from


substances of natural or synthetic origin, or independently by means


of chemical synthesis or by a combination of extraction and chemical


synthesis. “Manufacturer” includes any person who packages,


repackages or labels any container of any controlled dangerous


substance, except practitioners who dispense or compound


prescription orders for delivery to the ultimate consumer;


31. “Marijuana” means all parts of the plant Cannabis sativa


L., whether growing or not; the seeds thereof; the resin extracted


from any part of such plant; and every compound, manufacture, salt,


derivative, mixture or preparation of such plant, its seeds or


resin, but shall not include:


a. the mature stalks of such plant or fiber produced from


such stalks,


b. oil or cake made from the seeds of such plant,


including cannabidiol derived from the seeds of the


marijuana plant,


c. any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative,


mixture or preparation of such mature stalks (except


the resin extracted therefrom), including cannabidiol


derived from mature stalks, fiber, oil or cake,



Req. No. 889 Page 32


d. the sterilized seed of such plant which is incapable


of germination,


e. for any person participating in a clinical trial to


administer cannabidiol for the treatment of severe


forms of epilepsy pursuant to Section 2-802 of this


title, a drug or substance approved by the federal


Food and Drug Administration for use by those


participants,


f. for any person or the parents, legal guardians or


caretakers of the person who have received a written


certification from a physician licensed in this state


that the person has been diagnosed by a physician as


having Lennox-Gastaut syndrome, Dravet syndrome, also


known as severe myoclonic epilepsy of infancy, or any


other severe form of epilepsy that is not adequately


treated by traditional medical therapies, spasticity


due to multiple sclerosis or due to paraplegia,


intractable nausea and vomiting, appetite stimulation


with chronic wasting diseases, the substance


cannabidiol, a nonpsychoactive cannabinoid, found in


the plant Cannabis sativa L. or any other preparation


thereof, that has a tetrahydrocannabinol concentration


not more than three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) and



Req. No. 889 Page 33


that is delivered to the patient in the form of a


liquid,


g. any federal Food and Drug Administration-approved drug


or substance, or


h. industrial hemp, from the plant Cannabis sativa L. and


any part of such plant, whether growing or not, with a


delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration not more


than three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) on a dry-


weight basis which shall only be grown pursuant to the


Oklahoma Industrial Hemp Program and may be shipped


intrastate and interstate;


32. “Medical purpose” means an intention to utilize a


controlled dangerous substance for physical or mental treatment, for


diagnosis, or for the prevention of a disease condition not in


violation of any state or federal law and not for the purpose of


satisfying physiological or psychological dependence or other abuse;


33. “Mid-level practitioner” means an Advanced Practice


Registered Nurse as defined and within parameters specified in


Section 567.3a of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes, or a certified


animal euthanasia technician as defined in Section 698.2 of Title 59


of the Oklahoma Statutes, or an animal control officer registered by


the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control


under subsection B of Section 2-301 of this title within the



Req. No. 889 Page 34


parameters of such officer’s duties under Sections 501 through 508


of Title 4 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


34. “Narcotic drug” means any of the following, whether


produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of


vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis,


or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:


a. opium, coca leaves and opiates,


b. a compound, manufacture, salt, derivative or


preparation of opium, coca leaves or opiates,


c. cocaine, its salts, optical and geometric isomers, and


salts of isomers,


d. ecgonine, its derivatives, their salts, isomers and


salts of isomers, and


e. a substance, and any compound, manufacture, salt,


derivative or preparation thereof, which is chemically


identical with any of the substances referred to in


subparagraphs a through d of this paragraph, except


that the words narcotic drug as used in Section 2-101


et seq. of this title shall not include decocainized


coca leaves or extracts of coca leaves, which extracts


do not contain cocaine or ecgonine;


35. “Opiate” or “opioid” means any Schedule II, III, IV or V


substance having an addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining


liability similar to morphine or being capable of conversion into a

Req. No. 889 Page 35


drug having such addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining


liability. The terms do not include, unless specifically designated


as controlled under the Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Act,


the dextrorotatory isomer of 3-methoxy-n-methyl-morphinan and its


salts (dextromethorphan). The terms do include the racemic and


levorotatory forms;


36. “Opium poppy” means the plant of the species Papaver


somniferum L., except the seeds thereof;


37. “Palliative care” means a specialized medical service for


people of any age and at any stage of a serious illness or life-


altering medical event that focuses on navigating complex medical


decisions while providing patient autonomy and access to


information. Utilizing a holistic and interdisciplinary team


approach, palliative care addresses physical, intellectual,


emotional, social, and spiritual needs. Palliative care may be


provided in the inpatient, outpatient, or home care setting and


strives to improve quality of life for both the patient and the


family;


38. “Patient-provider agreement” means a written contract or


agreement that is executed between a practitioner and a patient


prior to the commencement of treatment for chronic pain using an


opioid drug as a means to:





Req. No. 889 Page 36


a. explain the possible risk of development of physical


or psychological dependence in the patient and prevent


the possible development of addiction,


b. document the understanding of both the practitioner


and the patient regarding the patient-provider


agreement of the patient,


c. establish the rights of the patient in association


with treatment and the obligations of the patient in


relation to the responsible use, discontinuation of


use, and storage of opioid drugs, including any


restrictions on the refill of prescriptions or the


acceptance of opioid prescriptions from practitioners,


d. identify the specific medications and other modes of


treatment, including physical therapy or exercise,


relaxation, or psychological counseling, that are


included as a part of the patient-provider agreement,


e. specify the measures the practitioner may employ to


monitor the compliance of the patient including, but


not limited to, random specimen screens and pill


counts, and


f. delineate the process for terminating the agreement,


including the consequences if the practitioner has


reason to believe that the patient is not complying


with the terms of the agreement. Compliance with the

Req. No. 889 Page 37


consent items described in this paragraph shall


constitute a valid, informed consent for opioid


therapy. The practitioner shall be held harmless from


civil litigation for failure to treat pain if the


event occurs because of nonadherence by the patient


with any of the provisions of the patient-provider


agreement;


39. “Peace officer” means a police officer, sheriff, deputy


sheriff, district attorney’s investigator, investigator from the


Office of the Attorney General, or any other person elected or


appointed by law to enforce any of the criminal laws of this state


or of the United States;


40. “Person” means an individual, corporation, government or


governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust,


partnership or association, or any other legal entity;


41. “Poppy straw” means all parts, except the seeds, of the


opium poppy, after mowing;


42. “Practitioner” means:


a. (1) a medical doctor or osteopathic physician,


(2) a dentist,


(3) a podiatrist,


(4) an optometrist,


(5) a veterinarian,


(6) a physician assistant or,

Req. No. 889 Page 38


(7) an Advanced Practice Registered Nurse under the


supervision of a licensed medical doctor or


osteopathic physician,


(7) (8) a scientific investigator, or


(8) (9) any other person,


licensed, registered or otherwise permitted to


prescribe, distribute, dispense, conduct research with


respect to, use for scientific purposes or administer


a controlled dangerous substance in the course of


professional practice or research in this state, or


b. a pharmacy, hospital, laboratory or other institution


licensed, registered or otherwise permitted to


distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect


to, use for scientific purposes or administer a


controlled dangerous substance in the course of


professional practice or research in this state;


43. “Production” includes the manufacture, planting,


cultivation, growing or harvesting of a controlled dangerous


substance;


44. “Serious illness” means a medical illness or physical


injury or condition that substantially affects quality of life for


more than a short period of time. Serious illness includes, but is


not limited to, Alzheimer’s disease or related dementias, lung



Req. No. 889 Page 39


disease, cancer, heart failure, renal failure, liver failure, or


chronic, unremitting, or intractable pain such as neuropathic pain;


45. “State” means the State of Oklahoma or any other state of


the United States;


46. “Straw person” or “straw party”, also known as a “front”,


means a third party who:


a. is put up in name only to take part in a transaction


or otherwise is a nominal party to a transaction with


no actual control,


b. acts on behalf of another person to obtain title to


property and executes documents and instruments the


principal may direct respecting property, or


c. purchases property for another for the purpose of


concealing the identity of the real purchaser or to


accomplish some purpose otherwise in violation of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


47. “Surgical procedure” means a procedure that is performed


for the purpose of structurally altering the human body by incision


or destruction of tissues as part of the practice of medicine. This


term includes the diagnostic or therapeutic treatment of conditions


or disease processes by use of instruments such as lasers,


ultrasound, ionizing, radiation, scalpels, probes, or needles that


cause localized alteration or transportation of live human tissue by


cutting, burning, vaporizing, freezing, suturing, probing, or

Req. No. 889 Page 40


manipulating by closed reduction for major dislocations or


fractures, or otherwise altering by any mechanical, thermal, light-


based, electromagnetic, or chemical means;


48. a. “Synthetic controlled substance” means a substance:


(1) the chemical structure of which is substantially


similar to the chemical structure of a controlled


dangerous substance in Schedule I or II,


(2) which has a stimulant, depressant, or


hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous


system that is substantially similar to or


greater than the stimulant, depressant, or


hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous


system of a controlled dangerous substance in


Schedule I or II, or


(3) with respect to a particular person, which such


person represents or intends to have a stimulant,


depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the


central nervous system that is substantially


similar to or greater than the stimulant,


depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the


central nervous system of a controlled dangerous


substance in Schedule I or II.


b. The designation of gamma-butyrolactone or any other


chemical as a precursor, pursuant to Section 2-322 of

Req. No. 889 Page 41


this title, does not preclude a finding pursuant to


subparagraph a of this paragraph that the chemical is


a synthetic controlled substance.


c. Synthetic controlled substance does not include:


(1) a controlled dangerous substance,


(2) any substance for which there is an approved new


drug application,


(3) with respect to a particular person any


substance, if an exemption is in effect for


investigational use, for that person under the


provisions of Section 505 of the Federal Food,


Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C., Section 355,


to the extent conduct with respect to such


substance is pursuant to such exemption, or


(4) any substance to the extent not intended for


human consumption before such an exemption takes


effect with respect to that substance.


d. Prima facie evidence that a substance containing


salvia divinorum has been enhanced, concentrated, or


chemically or physically altered shall give rise to a


rebuttable presumption that the substance is a


synthetic controlled substance;


49. “Tetrahydrocannabinols” means all substances that have been


chemically synthesized to emulate the tetrahydrocannabinols of

Req. No. 889 Page 42


marijuana, specifically including any tetrahydrocannabinols derived


from industrial hemp; and


50. “Ultimate user” means a person who lawfully possesses a


controlled dangerous substance for the person’s own use or for the


use of a member of the person’s household or for administration to


an animal owned by the person or by a member of the person’s


household.


SECTION 9. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-312, as


amended by Section 2, Chapter 184, O.S.L. 2022 (63 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 2-312), is amended to read as follows:


Section 2-312. A. A physician, podiatrist, optometrist or a


dentist who has complied with the registration requirements of the


Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Act, in good faith and in


the course of such person’s professional practice only, may


prescribe and administer controlled dangerous substances, or may


cause the same to be administered by medical or paramedical


personnel acting under the direction and supervision of the


physician, podiatrist, optometrist or dentist, and only may dispense


controlled dangerous substances pursuant to the provisions of


Sections 355.1 and 355.2 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


B. A veterinarian who has complied with the registration


requirements of the Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Act, in


good faith and in the course of the professional practice of the


veterinarian only, and not for use by a human being, may prescribe,

Req. No. 889 Page 43


administer, and dispense controlled dangerous substances and may


cause them to be administered by an assistant or orderly under the


direction and supervision of the veterinarian.


C. An advanced practice nurse who is recognized to prescribe by


the Oklahoma Board of Nursing as an advanced registered nurse


practitioner, clinical nurse specialist or certified nurse-midwife,


who is subject to medical direction by a supervising physician,


pursuant to Section 567.3a of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and


who has complied with the registration requirements of the Uniform


Controlled Dangerous Substances Act, in good faith and in the course


of professional practice only, may prescribe and administer Schedule


III, IV and V controlled dangerous substances.


D. An advanced practice nurse who is recognized to order,


select, obtain and administer drugs by the Oklahoma Board of Nursing


as a certified registered nurse anesthetist pursuant to Section


353.1b of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes and who has complied


with the registration requirements of the Uniform Controlled


Dangerous Substances Act, in good faith and in the course of such


practitioner’s professional practice only, may order, select, obtain


and administer Schedules II through V controlled dangerous


substances in a preanesthetic preparation or evaluation; anesthesia


induction, maintenance or emergence; or postanesthesia care setting


only. A certified registered nurse anesthetist may order, select,



Req. No. 889 Page 44


obtain and administer such drugs only during the perioperative or


periobstetrical period.


E. A physician assistant who is recognized to prescribe by the


State Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision under the medical


direction of a supervising physician, pursuant to Section 519.6 of


Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and who has complied with the


registration requirements of the Uniform Controlled Dangerous


Substances Act, in good faith and in the course of professional


practice only, may prescribe and administer Schedule:


1. Schedules II through V controlled dangerous substances if


the physician assistant practices under a practice agreement with a


delegating physician as provided by Section 519.6 of Title 59 of the


Oklahoma Statutes; or


2. Schedules III through V controlled dangerous substances if


the physician assistant does not practice under a practice agreement


as provided by Section 519.6 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 10. REPEALER 59 O.S. 2021, Section 521.4, is


hereby repealed.


SECTION 11. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-889 DC 1/19/2025 5:43:47 AM







Req. No. 889 Page 45